Georgia, session 2025_26, HB288.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
23 SECTION 1.
24 Title 15 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to courts, is amended in Code
25 Section 15-16-1, relating to qualification requirements for sheriff and exemptions, by
26 revising subparagraph (J) of paragraph (1) and paragraph (2) of subsection (c) and by
27 revising subsection (d) as follows:
28 "(J) At the time of qualifying as a candidate for the office of sheriff, Is a registered
29 peace officer as provided in Code Section 35-8-10 or is a certified peace officer, as
30 defined in Chapter 8 of Title 35, not under revocation by the Georgia Peace Officer
31 Standards and Training Council and files with the officer before whom such person
32 qualifies a form signed by the executive director of the Georgia Peace Officer Standards
33 and Training Council, or his or her designee, that attests and certifies such; provided,
34 however, that any person who is not a certified peace officer at the time of qualifying
35 as a candidate for the office of sheriff but is a first responder, as such term is defined
36 in Code Section 45-25-2, is a retired or honorably discharged member of the United
37 States armed forces, or is a former or current local, state, or federal law enforcement
38 officer shall swear or affirm before the officer before whom such person has qualified
39 to seek the office of sheriff that he or she is capable of and will complete the
40 requirements for certification within six months after taking office. Any person such
41 first responder, retired or honorably discharged member of the United States armed
42 forces, or former or current local, state, or federal law enforcement officer who is not
43 a registered or certified peace officer at the time such person assumes the office of
44 sheriff shall be required to complete satisfactorily the requirements for certification as
- 2 -

25 LC 62 0195S
45 a peace officer as provided in Chapter 8 of Title 35 within six months after such person
46 takes office; provided, however, that an extension of the time to complete such
47 requirements may be granted by the Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training
48 Council upon the presentation of evidence by a sheriff that he or she was unable to
49 complete the basic training course and certification requirements due to illness, injury,
50 military service, or other reasons deemed sufficient by such council. The Georgia
51 Peace Officer Standards and Training Council shall make every effort to ensure that
52 space is available for newly elected sheriffs who are not certified or registered peace
53 officers to attend the course as soon as possible after such persons take office. Such
54 council shall notify the appropriate judge of the probate court whenever a newly elected
55 sheriff who is not certified fails to become certified as a peace officer pursuant to the
56 requirements of this subparagraph.
57 (2) Each person offering his or her candidacy for the office of sheriff shall at the time
58 such person qualifies, swear or affirm before the officer before whom such person has
59 qualified to seek the office of sheriff that he or she meets all of the qualifications required
60 by this subsection, except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (J) of paragraph (1) of
61 this subsection, and at the time such person qualifies, that he or she has complied or will
62 comply with the requirements of subparagraph (G) of paragraph (1) of this subsection no
63 later than the close of business on the third business day following the close of such
64 qualification period, and that, if applicable, he or she will comply with the requirements
65 of subparagraph (J) of paragraph (1) of this subsection within six months of taking office.
66 Any person who knowingly provides false information in executing the affidavit required
67 by this paragraph commits the offense of false swearing within the meaning of and
68 subject to the penalties prescribed in Code Section 16-10-71 and submission of a false
69 document in violation of Code Section 16-10-20."
70 "(d) Exemption. The requirements of subparagraphs (c)(1)(D), (c)(1)(E),
71 through (c)(1)(F), (c)(1)(H), (c)(1)(I), and (c)(1)(J) of this Code section shall be deemed
- 3 -

25 LC 62 0195S
72 to have been met by any person who is currently serving as a duly qualified and elected
73 sheriff of one of the several counties of this state."
74 SECTION 2.
75 Said title is further amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
76 "15-18-33.
77 (a) As used in this Code section, the term:
78 (1) 'Affected peace officer' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code
79 Section 35-8-2.
80 (2) 'Giglio list' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 35-8-2.
81 (b) Upon the placement of the name of a peace officer on a Giglio list by a prosecuting
82 attorney, such prosecuting attorney shall send written notice of the intent to place the name
83 of a peace officer on such list by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery
84 to the last known address of the employer of the affected peace officer and the Georgia
85 Peace Officer Standards and Training Council. Such notice shall include:
86 (1) The factual basis for the prosecuting attorney's decision to place the name of the
87 peace officer on a Giglio list:
88 (2) A statement informing the affected peace officer and his or her employing agency of
89 the right to request relevant materials from the prosecuting attorney;
90 (3) A statement informing the affected peace officer and his or her employing agency of
91 the right to provide supplemental information to the prosecuting attorney; and
92 (4) A statement informing the affected peace officer and his or her employing agency of
93 the right to request reconsideration by the prosecuting attorney of the placement of such
94 peace officer on a Giglio list.
95 (c) An affected peace officer or his or her employing agency shall be authorized to submit
96 a request for reconsideration on the decision to place the name of a peace officer on a
97 Giglio list no later than 30 days after receipt of notice by such peace officer's employing
- 4 -

25 LC 62 0195S
98 agency pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section. Upon receipt of a request for
99 reconsideration pursuant to this subsection, the prosecuting attorney shall promptly review
100 such request and either remove the name of the affected peace officer from the Giglio list
101 or deny the request for reconsideration and keep the name of the affected peace officer on
102 the Giglio list. Any such denial shall be in writing and include the specific reasons for such
103 decision. If no request for reconsideration pursuant to this subsection is submitted by an
104 affected peace officer or his or her employing agency, the name of the affected peace
105 officer shall remain on the Giglio list unless and until the prosecuting attorney removes
106 such name from the Giglio list due to receipt of material information that was unknown or
107 unavailable at the time of the initial decision or when any investigation warrants removal
108 in the opinion of the prosecuting attorney.
109 (d) When a prosecuting attorney makes a determination to remove an affected peace
110 officer's name from a Giglio list, such prosecuting attorney shall provide notice of such
111 removal to the employing agency of the affected peace officer and the Georgia Peace
112 Officer Standards and Training Council within 14 days of the removal in the same manner
113 as provided by subsection (b) of this Code section.
114 (e) The Prosecuting Attorneys' Council of the State of Georgia shall develop policies and
115 procedures for the purposes of this Code section, which shall include placement and
116 removal of the name of an affected peace officer on a Giglio list, the reconsideration
117 process, and notice requirements. Any prosecuting attorney's office that maintains a Giglio
118 list shall adopt the policies and procedures established pursuant to this subsection.
119 (f) A prosecuting attorney shall be authorized to use an affected peace officer's inclusion
120 on a Giglio list when making charging decisions related to a case and shall disclose to
121 defense counsel or a defendant in any criminal case as required by law the fact of and basis
122 for inclusion of an affected officer on such list including any notice or relevant materials
123 as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section.
- 5 -

25 LC 62 0195S
124 (g) A prosecuting attorney shall be immune from civil liability that might otherwise incur
125 or be imposed for placement of the name of a peace officer on a Giglio list unless the
126 affected peace officer demonstrates that his or her inclusion on such a list was done with
127 actual malice or with actual intent to cause injury to the affected peace officer.
128 (h) Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to modify federal law or binding court
129 precedent relating to disclosure duties of a prosecuting attorney in criminal prosecutions."
130 SECTION 3.
131 Chapter 8 of Title 35 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to employment and
132 training of peace officers, is amended in Code Section 35-8-2, relating to definitions, by
133 adding two new paragraphs to read as follows:
134 "(.1) 'Affected peace officer' means a peace officer whose name is listed on a Giglio list."
135 "(5.01) 'Giglio list' means a list of names compiled and maintained by a prosecuting
136 attorney of officers disqualified from trial testimony because of identified or alleged
137 issues of credibility or bias."
138 SECTION 4.
139 Said chapter is further amended in Code Section 35-8-7, relating to powers and duties of the
140 Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council generally, by adding a new paragraph
141 to read as follows:
142 "(14.1) Upon notice from a prosecuting attorney, to review the factual basis for the
143 inclusion of any affected peace officer on a Giglio list;"
144 SECTION 5.
145 Said chapter is further amended in Code Section 35-8-7.1, relating to authority of council to
146 refuse certificate to applicant or to discipline council certified officer or exempt officer,
147 grounds, restoration of certificate, emergency suspension of certification, notice of
- 6 -

25 LC 62 0195S
148 investigation, and retention of records, by revising subsections (e) through (g) and by adding
149 a new subsection to read as follows:
150 "(e)(1) Upon receipt of notice from a prosecuting attorney that the name of a peace
151 officer has been placed on a Giglio list, the council shall initiate a review of the factual
152 basis provided in such notice and notify the affected peace officer and the head of the law
153 enforcement agency that employs such affected peace officer of such review. It shall be
154 sufficient to identify the affected peace officer, state that review of the affected peace
155 officer's name on a Giglio list has been initiated, and identify the prosecuting attorney
156 who sent such notice.
157 (2) In reviewing the inclusion of the name of an affected peace officer on a Giglio list
158 pursuant to this subsection, the council shall consider:
159 (A) Any bias or injury against a specific defendant alleged by the prosecuting attorney
160 to have occurred when the prosecuting attorney's notice relates to a specific criminal
161 prosecution;
162 (B) Allegations or instances of previous misleading, deceptive, untrue, or fraudulent
163 statements made by the affected peace officer to the prosecuting attorney or while
164 serving as a witness for the prosecuting attorney;
165 (C) Whether the affected peace officer has pleaded guilty or been convicted, by final
166 judgment and when all appeals have been exhausted, of an offense punishable as false
167 swearing within the meaning of Code Section 16-10-71 or an offense of perjury
168 pursuant to Code Section 16-10-70; and
169 (D) Any allegations of acts or omissions which would otherwise subject the affected
170 peace officer to discipline pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section.
171 (3) Upon completion of review pursuant to this subsection, the council shall notify the
172 affected peace officer and the employing agency of the affected peace officer of its
173 determination concerning the factual basis asserted by the prosecuting attorney. If the
174 council determines from its review that discipline of the affected peace officer is
- 7 -

25 LC 62 0195S
175 warranted, notice sent pursuant to this paragraph shall include such information. If the
176 council determines that discipline of the affected peace officer is not warranted, such
177 matter shall be administratively dismissed, the affected peace officer's public status shall
178 not reflect the occurrence of such investigation, and notice of such action shall be
179 delivered to the head of the employing agency, the affected peace officer, and the
180 prosecuting attorney who placed the affected peace officer on a Giglio list. No peace
181 officer shall be suspended, revoked, or otherwise sanctioned solely based upon the
182 placement of his or her name on a Giglio list.
183 (f) Upon initiating an investigation of an a peace officer for possible disciplinary action
184 or upon disciplining an a peace officer pursuant to this Code section, the council shall
185 notify the head of the law enforcement agency that employs such peace officer of the
186 investigation or disciplinary action. In the case of an investigation, it It shall be sufficient
187 for such notice to identify the peace officer and state that a disciplinary investigation has
188 been opened. Notice of the initiation of an investigation shall be sent by priority mail. If
189 the investigation is completed without any further action, notice of the termination of such
190 investigation shall also be provided to the head of the employing agency. In the case of
191 disciplinary action, the notice shall identify the officer and state the nature of the
192 disciplinary action taken. The notice of disposition shall be sent only after the action of the
193 council is deemed final. Such notice shall be sent by priority mail.
194 (f)(g) If the certification of an a peace officer is suspended or revoked by either the
195 executive director or council pursuant to this Code section, then the council shall notify the
196 head of the law enforcement agency that employs the peace officer; the district attorney of
197 the judicial circuit in which such law enforcement agency is located; and the solicitor of
198 the state court, if any, of the county in which such law enforcement agency is located. It
199 shall be sufficient for this notice to identify the peace officer and state the length of time,
200 if known, that the peace officer will not have powers of arrest. Such notice shall be sent
201 by priority mail.
- 8 -

25 LC 62 0195S
202 (h) Any notice required by this Code section shall be sent by certified mail or certificate
203 of mailing. As used in this subsection, the term 'certificate of mailing' means a delivery
204 method utilized by the United States Postal Service which provides evidence that an item
205 has been sent and the date such item was accepted.
206 (g)(i) Notwithstanding Article 5 of Chapter 18 of Title 50, records of an investigation of
207 an a peace officer by the council, including, but not limited to, records used to investigate
208 complaints against an a peace officer and polygraph case files containing official polygraph
209 reports, shall be retained for 30 years following the date that such investigation is deemed
210 concluded by the council and then such records may be destroyed; provided, however, that
211 the council shall have the authority to destroy such records prior to such 30 years where
212 such peace officer is deceased and no action upon the complaint was taken by the council
213 beyond the council's initial intake of such complaint."
214 SECTION 6.
215 Said chapter is further amended in Code Section 35-8-7.2, relating to administrative
216 procedure, hearings, and review, by revising subsection (a) as follows:
217 "(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, proceedings of
218 the council in the exercise of its authority to issue any certificate, conduct a review of the
219 inclusion of an affected peace officer on a Giglio list, or discipline any peace officer under
220 the terms of this chapter shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the
221 'Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.' In all such proceedings the council shall have
222 authority to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of any book, writing,
223 or document upon the issuance of a subpoena therefor. In any hearing in which the fitness
224 of a peace officer or applicant is in question, the council may exclude all persons from its
225 deliberation of the appropriate action and may, when it deems necessary, speak to the peace
226 officer or applicant in private. All final determinations, findings, and conclusions of the
227 council under this chapter are final and conclusive decisions of the matters involved."
- 9 -

25 LC 62 0195S
228 SECTION 7.
229 Said chapter is further amended by revising Code Section 35-8-8, relating to requirements
230 for appointment or certification of persons as peace officers and preemployment attendance
231 at basic training course and "employment related information" defined, and by redesignating
232 the current provisions of subsection (c) of said Code section as a new Code section to read
233 as follows:
234 "35-8-8.
235 (a) Any person employed or certified as a peace officer shall:
236 (1) Be at least 18 years of age;
237 (2) Be a citizen of the United States;
238 (3) Have a high school diploma or its recognized equivalent;
239 (4) Not have been convicted by any state or by the federal government of any crime the
240 punishment for which could have been imprisonment in the federal or state prison or
241 institution nor have been convicted of sufficient misdemeanors to establish a pattern of
242 disregard for the law, provided that, for the purposes of this paragraph, violations of
243 traffic laws and other offenses involving the operation of motor vehicles when the
244 applicant has received a pardon shall not be considered;
245 (5) Be fingerprinted for the purpose of conducting a fingerprint based search at the
246 Georgia Bureau of Investigation and the Federal Bureau of Investigation to determine the
247 existence of any criminal record;
248 (6) Possess good moral character as determined by investigation under procedure
249 established by the council and fully cooperate during the course of such investigation;
250 (7) Be found, after examination by a licensed physician or surgeon, to be free from any
251 physical, emotional, or mental conditions which might adversely affect his or her exercise
252 of the powers or duties of a peace officer; and
253 (8) Successfully complete a job related academy entrance examination provided for and
254 administered by the council in conformity with state and federal law. Such examination
- 10 -

25 LC 62 0195S
255 shall be administered prior to entrance to the basic course provided for in Code
256 Sections 35-8-9 and 35-8-11. The council may change or modify such examination and
257 shall establish the criteria for determining satisfactory performance on such examination.
258 The provisions of this paragraph establish only the minimum requirements of academy
259 entrance examinations for peace officer candidates in this state; each law enforcement
260 unit agency is encouraged to provide such additional requirements and any
261 preemployment examination as it deems necessary and appropriate. Any person with a
262 degree from a postsecondary institution accredited by a regional accrediting agency
263 recognized by the United States Department of Education shall be deemed to have met
264 the requirements of this paragraph.
265 (b) Any person authorized to attend the basic training course prior to employment as a
266 peace officer shall meet the requirements of subsection (a) of this Code section.
267 (c) The executive director of the council, or his or her designee, shall promulgate a form
268 which shall be available to any person seeking election to the office of sheriff. Such form
269 shall provide for the attestation and certification by the executive director that the person
270 seeking such form is a certified peace officer who is not under revocation by the council.
271 35-8-8.1.
272 (c)(1) For purposes of this subsection (a) As used in this Code section, the term
273 'employment related information' means written information contained in a prior
274 employer's records or personnel files that relates to an applicant's, candidate's, or peace
275 officer's performance or behavior while employed by such prior employer, including
276 performance evaluations, records of disciplinary actions, and eligibility for rehire. Such
277 term shall not include information prohibited from disclosure by federal law or any
278 document not in the possession of the employer at the time a request for such information
279 is received.
- 11 -

25 LC 62 0195S
280 (b)(1)(2) Where an investigation is conducted for the purpose of hiring, certifying, or
281 continuing the certification of a peace officer, an employer shall disclose employment
282 related information to the investigating law enforcement agency upon receiving a written
283 request from such agency. Disclosure shall only be required under this subsection if the
284 law enforcement agency's request is accompanied by a copy of a signed, notarized
285 statement from the applicant, candidate, or peace officer releasing and holding harmless
286 such employer from any and all liability for disclosing complete and accurate information
287 to the law enforcement agency.
288 (3)(2) An employer may charge a reasonable fee to cover actual costs incurred in
289 copying and furnishing documents pursuant to this subsection to a requesting law
290 enforcement agency, including retrieving and redacting costs, provided such amount shall
291 not exceed $25.00 or 25¢ per page, whichever is greater. No employer shall be required
292 to prepare or create any document not already in the employer's possession at the time a
293 request for employment related information is received. Any employment related
294 information provided pursuant to this subsection that is not subject to public disclosure
295 while in the possession of a prior employer shall continue to be privileged and protected
296 from public disclosure as a record of the requesting law enforcement agency.
297 (4)(3) No employer or law enforcement agency shall be subject to any civil liability for
298 any cause of action by virtue of disclosing complete and accurate information to a law
299 enforcement agency in good faith and without malice pursuant to this subsection. In any
300 such cause of action, malice or bad faith shall only be demonstrated by clear and
301 convincing evidence. Nothing contained in this subsection shall be construed so as to
302 affect or limit rights or remedies provided by federal law.
303 (5)(4) Before taking final action on an application for employment based, in whole or in
304 part, on any unfavorable employment related information received from a previous
305 employer, a law enforcement agency shall inform the applicant, candidate, or peace
306 officer that it has received such employment related information and that the applicant,
- 12 -

25 LC 62 0195S
307 candidate, or peace officer may inspect and respond in writing to such information. Upon
308 the applicant's, candidate's, or peace officer's request, the law enforcement agency shall
309 allow him or her to inspect the employment related information and to submit a written
310 response to such information. The request for inspection shall be made within five
311 business days from the date that the applicant, candidate, or peace officer is notified of
312 the law enforcement agency's receipt of such employment related information. The
313 inspection shall occur not later than ten business days after said notification. Any
314 response to the employment related information shall be made by the applicant,
315 candidate, or peace officer not later than three business days after his or her inspection.
316 (6)(5) Nothing contained in this Code section subsection shall be construed so as to
317 require any person to provide self-incriminating information or otherwise to compel any
318 person to act in violation of his or her right guaranteed by the Fifth Amendment of the
319 United States Constitution and Article I, Section I, Paragraph XVI of the Georgia
320 Constitution. It shall not be a violation of this Code section subsection for a person to fail
321 to provide requested information based on a claim that such information is
322 self-incriminating provided that notice of such claim is served in lieu of the requested
323 information. An action against such person to require disclosure on the grounds that the
324 claim of self-incrimination is not substantiated may be brought in the superior court of
325 the county of such party's residence or where such information is located.
326 (c) A law enforcement agency that receives notice from a prosecuting attorney that the
327 name of an affected peace officer has been placed on a Giglio list shall forward a copy of
328 such notice to the council within 30 days of receipt for review pursuant to Code
329 Section 35-8-7.1."
330 SECTION 8.
331 Said chapter is further amended by revising Code Section 35-8-14, which is designated as
332 reserved, as follows:
- 13 -

25 LC 62 0195S
333 "35-8-14.
334 (a) Upon receipt of notice from a prosecuting attorney that a peace officer employed by
335 the law enforcement agency has been placed on a Giglio list, such agency shall provide a
336 copy of such notice to the affected peace officer in as timely manner as possible, not to
337 exceed three days from the date of receipt. If the affected peace officer is no longer
338 employed by the law enforcement agency that receives such notice, the law enforcement
339 agency shall forward such notice to be served in person or delivered by certified mail or
340 statutory overnight delivery, return receipt requested, to the last known address of the
341 affected peace officer.
342 (b) A law enforcement agency that employs an affected peace officer shall not demote,
343 suspend, discharge, impose discipline, or take adverse employment action upon an affected
344 peace officer solely based upon the placement of such peace officer's name on a Giglio list.
345 (c) A law enforcement agency that employs an affected peace officer shall be authorized
346 to demote, suspend, discharge, impose discipline, or take adverse employment action upon
347 an affected peace officer when:
348 (1) An internal investigation establishes, based upon a preponderance of the evidence,
349 that a factual basis exists for the reason provided by the prosecuting attorney for
350 placement of the affected peace officer on a Giglio list; or
351 (2) The council has imposed discipline upon the affected peace officer for the conduct
352 identified by the prosecuting attorney which was the basis for placement of such officer
353 on the Giglio list Reserved."
354 SECTION 9.
355 Code Section 50-18-72 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to when public
356 disclosure not required, is amended by adding a new paragraph to subsection (a) to read as
357 follows:
358 "(4.1) Records relating to Giglio lists, as such term is defined in Code Section 35-8-2;"
- 14 -

25 LC 62 0195S
359 SECTION 10.
360 This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
361 without such approval.
362 SECTION 11.
363 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
- 15 -